Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1669.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 13-1421, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE13-1421. Evidence relating to victim's chastity; pretrial hearing A. Evidence relating to a victim's reputation for chastity and opinion evidence relating to a victim's chastity are not admissible in any prosecution for any offense in this chapter, section 13-3212 or chapter 35.1 of this title. Evidence of specific instances of the victim's prior sexual conduct may be admitted only if a judge finds the evidence is relevant and is material to a fact in issue in the case and that the inflammatory or prejudicial nature of the evidence does not outweigh the probative value of the evidence, and if the evidence is one of the following: 1. Evidence of the victim's past sexual conduct with the defendant. 2. Evidence of specific instances of sexual activity showing the source or origin of semen, pregnancy, disease or trauma physical inJury. 3. Evidence that supports a claim that the victim has a motive in accusing the defendant of the crime. 4. Evidence offered for the purpose of impeachment when the prosecutor puts the victim's prior sexual conduct in issue. 5. Evidence of false allegations of sexual misconduct made by the victim against others. B. Evidence described in subsection A of this section shall not be referred to in any statements to a jury or introduced at trial without a court order after a hearing on written motions is held to determine the admissibility of the evidence. If new information is discovered during the course of the trial that may make the evidence described in subsection A of this section admissible, the court may hold a hearing to determine the admissibility of the evidence under subsection A of this section. The standard for admissibility of evidence under subsection A of this section is by clear and convincing evidence. END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 22, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 22, 2026.